Nevada, session 83, AB304.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. In addition to complying with any other
applicable state or federal requirements, and except as otherwise
provided in subsection 2, a practitioner or entity who implements a
pilot program in this State shall submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau:
(a) Before any research is conducted under the pilot program, a
notification that contains:
(1) The name of the practitioner or entity conducting the
research under the pilot program;
(2) A description of the purpose, scope and objectives of the
research to be conducted under the pilot program, which must
include, without limitation, an identification of whether transcranial
magnetic stimulation or electromagnetic brain pulse treatment, or
both, will be used in the pilot program;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(3) The number of research subjects anticipated to be
involved in the pilot program and a general description of the
characteristics of each research subject;
(4) Any location at which the research will be conducted
under the pilot program; and
(5) An identification of any licenses, registrations and other
approvals that are necessary to conduct the research under the pilot
program and proof that the practitioner or entity has obtained all
such licenses, registrations and approvals;
(b) At least once each calendar quarter while research is being
conducted under the pilot program, a report concerning the research,
which must include, without limitation:
(1) The number of research subjects participating in the pilot
program in the immediately preceding calendar quarter;
(2) Aggregated demographic information concerning the
research subjects;
(3) Baseline health and mental health assessments of the
research subjects;
(4) Outcomes of treatment, including, without limitation,
longitudinal data after the conclusion of treatments; and
(5) Data relating to any monitoring that is performed for
ethical or safety purposes; and
(c) After the pilot program has concluded, a report on the results
of the research conducted under the pilot program and any
corresponding recommendations relating to the research.
2. If multiple practitioners or entities conduct research under
the same pilot program, the practitioners or entities may submit a
single report pursuant to subsection 1 concerning the pilot program.
3. A notification or report submitted pursuant to subsection 1
must not contain any information that would lead to the
identification of any research subject participating in the pilot
program.
4. A practitioner or entity shall not implement a pilot program
unless the practitioner or entity complies with the provisions of this
section.
5. Nothing in the provisions of this section:
(a) Requires the Legislative Counsel Bureau to evaluate, review
or take any action other than receiving the notifications and reports
pursuant to this section.
(b) Prohibits a practitioner or entity from collaborating with an
institution of higher education in this State to provide support
concerning the pilot program, including, without limitation, training,
data collection or ethical review.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) Prohibits a practitioner or entity or the collaborator of a
practitioner or entity, including, without limitation, an institution of
higher education in this State with whom the practitioner or entity is
collaborating, from accepting gifts, grants, donations and other
resources of money to support the pilot program.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Electromagnetic brain pulse treatment” means a
noninvasive and non-pharmaceutical treatment that uses
electroencephalography and transcranial magnetic stimulation to
identify abnormal patterns in brainwaves and provide therapeutic
electromagnetic stimulation to normalize brain activity.
(b) “Pilot program” means a research project that involves the
provision of transcranial magnetic stimulation or electromagnetic
brain pulse treatment, or both, to subjects in this State.
(c) “Transcranial magnetic stimulation” means a noninvasive
procedure that uses magnetic pulses to stimulate specific areas of
the brain to alter brain activity.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on October 1, 2025, and
expires by limitation on September 30, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)